Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB719.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Prohibiting Insurance Discrimination for Persons on PrEP and PEP Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adverse action." Any of the following actions done solely because an individual applicant or individual enrollee, or a group to which the individual applicant or individual enrollee belongs, has filled or is being prescribed PrEP or PEP:(1) Denying or canceling insurance coverage for the 1234567891011121314151617 applicant or enrollee.(2) Limiting the amount, extent or kind of coverage available to the applicant or enrollee.(3) Charging the applicant or enrollee, or a group to which the applicant or enrollee belongs, a rate that is different from the rate charged to other applicants or enrollees."Applicant." An individual or group that seeks to obtain coverage under an insurance policy from an insurer."Enrollee." A policyholder, subscriber or covered person under an insurance policy."Insurance policy." A life insurance policy, disability policy, long-term care policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that is offered, issued or renewed by an insurer."Insurer." An entity licensed or authorized to conduct the business of insurance that is governed under the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act."PEP." A post-exposure prophylaxis HIV medication that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and that can be taken as a prophylaxis to prevent the transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus after a person is exposed."PrEP." A pre-exposure prophylaxis HIV medication that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and that can be taken as a prophylaxis to prevent the transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus before a person is exposed.Section 3. Prohibition on discrimination.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer may not take an adverse action on an insurance policy against an applicant or enrollee solely based on the applicant's or 20250HB0719PN0738 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrollee's prior or current claim or obtainment of a prescription for PrEP or PEP.Section 4. Enforcement.A violation of this act shall constitute:(1) Unfair discrimination under section 353 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices under the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0719PN0738 - 3 - 12345678910111213